Massachusetts, session 194th, H4083.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 2JJJJJJ the following section:-
Section 2KKKKKK. There shall be established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth a separate fund known as the Bourne Bridge Replacement Fund, to be
administered by the Massachusetts Department of Transportation. The fund shall be credited
with: (i) appropriations or other money authorized or transferred by the general court and
specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) funds from public and private sources,
including, but not limited to, gifts, grants and donations; (iii) any funds received from the federal
government for the replacement of the Bourne bridge; and (iv) any interest earned on the assets
of the fund. Amounts credited to the fund may be expended by the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation, without further appropriation, for costs related to the replacement of the Bourne
of 2

bridge. Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General
Fund. The fund shall not be subject to section 5C.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, $200,000,000 of
income surtax revenue, as defined in section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29 of the General Laws,
collected in the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2025 but certified after July 20, 2025, shall be
transferred from the Education and Transportation Fund established in said section 2BBBBBB of
said chapter 29 to the Bourne Bridge Replacement Fund established in section 2KKKKKK of
said chapter 29, not later than 30 days after the effective date of this act.
of 2